Iowa, session 2025-2026, HSB135.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 2291YC (3) 91 th/ns H.F. _____ Section 1. NEW SECTION . 321H.3A Education program required 1 for certain recyclers. 2 1. Beginning January 1, 2027, a person shall not recycle 3 battery electric motor vehicles or plug-in hybrid electric 4 motor vehicles, as those terms are defined in section 321.116, 5 unless the person is an authorized vehicle recycler who 6 has successfully completed a vehicle high-voltage battery 7 safe handling and storage education program approved by the 8 department. An authorized vehicle recycler shall display a 9 program completion certificate next to the recyclerâs license 10 displayed as required by section 321H.5. 11 2. The department shall approve vehicle high-voltage 12 battery safe handling and storage education programs and such 13 programs shall award a program completion certificate to an 14 authorized vehicle recycler who successfully completes the 15 program. 16